Illinois, session 104th, HB3227.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Budget Law of the Civil 5Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by changing Section 650-10 as follows: 7    (15 ILCS 20/50-10)  (was 15 ILCS 20/38.1)8    Sec. 50-10. Budget contents. The budget shall be submitted 9by the Governor with line item and program data. The budget 10shall also contain performance data presenting an estimate for 11the current fiscal year, projections for the budget year, and 12information for the 3 prior fiscal years comparing department 13objectives with actual accomplishments, formulated according 14to the various functions and activities, and, wherever the 15nature of the work admits, according to the work units, for 16which the respective departments, offices, and institutions of 17the State government (including the elective officers in the 18executive department and including the University of Illinois 19and the judicial department) are responsible.20    For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 1992 and for each 21fiscal year thereafter, the budget shall include the 22performance measures of each department's accountability 23report.  HB3227- 2 -LRB104 09800 SPS 19866 b1    For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 1997 and for each 2fiscal year thereafter, the budget shall include one or more 3line items appropriating moneys to the Department of Human 4Services to fund participation in the Home-Based Support 5Services Program for Adults with Mental Disabilities under the 6Developmental Disability and Mental Disability Services Act by 7persons described in Section 2-17 of that Act.8    For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2019, and for each 9fiscal year thereafter, the budget shall include a separate 10line item request appropriating moneys to each State agency 11for: (1) estimated costs for each fund under the State Prompt 12Payment Act; and (2) estimated costs for each fund under 13Sections 368a and 370a of the Illinois Insurance Code. 14    For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and for each 15fiscal year thereafter, the budget shall include a separate 16line item request appropriating moneys to each State agency 17for: (1) estimated costs for services provided to undocumented 18immigrants and asylum seekers through various State grants, 19entitlements, or other programmatic services; and (2) 20expenditures for the previous fiscal year and estimated 21expenditures for the current fiscal year for services provided 22to undocumented immigrants and asylum seekers through various 23State grants, entitlements, or other programmatic services. 24    The budget shall contain a capital development section in 25which the Governor will present (1) information on the capital 26projects and capital programs for which appropriations are   HB3227- 3 -LRB104 09800 SPS 19866 b1requested, (2) the capital spending plans, which shall 2document the first and subsequent years cash requirements by 3fund for the proposed bonded program, and (3) a statement that 4shall identify by year the principal and interest costs until 5retirement of the State's general obligation debt. In 6addition, the principal and interest costs of the budget year 7program shall be presented separately, to indicate the 8marginal cost of principal and interest payments necessary to 9retire the additional bonds needed to finance the budget 10year's capital program. In 2004 only, the capital development 11section of the State budget shall be submitted by the Governor 12not later than the fourth Tuesday of March (March 23, 2004). 13    The budget shall contain a section indicating whether 14there is a projected budget surplus or a projected budget 15deficit for general funds in the current fiscal year, or 16whether the current fiscal year's general funds budget is 17projected to be balanced, based on estimates prepared by the 18Governor's Office of Management and Budget using actual 19figures available on the date the budget is submitted. That 20section shall present this information in both a numerical 21table format and by way of a narrative description, and shall 22include information for the proposed upcoming fiscal year, the 23current fiscal year, and the 2 years prior to the current 24fiscal year. These estimates must specifically and separately 25identify any non-recurring revenues, including, but not 26limited to, borrowed money, money derived by borrowing or   HB3227- 4 -LRB104 09800 SPS 19866 b1transferring from other funds, or any non-operating financial 2source. None of these specifically and separately identified 3non-recurring revenues may include any revenue that cannot be 4realized without a change to law.  The table shall show 5accounts payable at the end of each fiscal year in a manner 6that specifically and separately identifies any general funds 7liabilities accrued during the current and prior fiscal years 8that may be paid from future fiscal years' appropriations, 9including, but not limited to, costs that may be paid beyond 10the end of the lapse period as set forth in Section 25 of the 11State Finance Act and costs incurred by the Department on 12Aging. The section shall also include an estimate of 13individual and corporate income tax overpayments that will not 14be refunded before the close of the fiscal year. 15    For the budget year, the current year, and 3 prior fiscal 16years, the Governor shall also include in the budget estimates 17of or actual values for the assets and liabilities for General 18Assembly Retirement System, State Employees' Retirement System 19of Illinois, State Universities Retirement System, Teachers' 20Retirement System of the State of Illinois, and Judges 21Retirement System of Illinois.22    The budget submitted by the Governor shall contain, in 23addition, in a separate book, a tabulation of all position and 24employment titles in each such department, office, and 25institution, the number of each, and the salaries for each, 26formulated according to divisions, bureaus, sections, offices,   HB3227- 5 -LRB104 09800 SPS 19866 b1departments, boards, and similar subdivisions, which shall 2correspond as nearly as practicable to the functions and 3activities for which the department, office, or institution is 4responsible.5    Together with the budget, the Governor shall transmit the 6estimates of receipts and expenditures, as received by the 7Director of the Governor's Office of Management and Budget, of 8the elective officers in the executive and judicial 9departments and of the University of Illinois.10    An applicable appropriations committee of each chamber of 11the General Assembly, for fiscal year 2012 and thereafter, 12must review individual line item appropriations and the total 13budget for each State agency, as defined in the Illinois State 14Auditing Act. 15(Source: P.A. 99-143, eff. 7-27-15; 100-1064, eff. 8-24-18.) 16    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 17becoming law.